Alaska statutes. Title 21. Insurance.
Article 1. Authorization of Insurers and General Requirements.
Sec. 21.09.205.
Quarterly statement.

The director may require an insurer to file quarterly financial statements. If required, the statements must follow for a given quarter the reporting format specified in the quarterly financial statement blank form and instructions most recently approved by the National Association of Insurance Commissioners.

A quarterly financial statement, if required, is due 45 days after the end of the quarter to which it applies.

An insurer shall pay to the division $100 for each day the insurer fails to file the quarterly statement in the form required or within the time established in (b) of this section.

In addition to the requirements of (a) of this section, an authorized insurer shall file its quarterly statement with the National Association of Insurance Commissioners on electronic media acceptable to the association by the due date established by the association, and shall pay the applicable filing fee. The director may waive the filing requirement if the insurer only transacts business in this state and only accepts risks relative to a subject resident, located, or to be performed in this state. An insurer that fails to comply with this subsection is subject to the penalties specified in (c) of this section, calculated from the filing and fee due date established by the National Association of Insurance Commissioners.

History.

(§ 19 ch 50 SLA 1990; am § 13 ch 62 SLA 1995; am § 12 ch 38 SLA 2002)

Administrative Code. —

For record and financial reporting, see 3 AAC 21, art. 3.

For reinsurance, see 3 AAC 21, art. 6.

Sec. 21.09.207.
Statement of actuarial opinion and supporting documentation.

An insurer authorized to write property, casualty, surety, marine, wet marine, transportation, or mortgage guaranty insurance shall file annually with the director a statement of actuarial opinion, unless the insurer is exempt or otherwise not required to file an opinion in the insurer’s state of domicile. The statement of actuarial opinion must

be issued by an actuary appointed by the insurer;

follow, for a given year, the reporting format and requirements specified in the annual financial statement instructions most recently approved by the National Association of Insurance Commissioners; and

be supplemented with additional information as may be required by the director.

A domestic insurer that is required to file a statement under (a) of this section shall file annually with the director an actuarial opinion summary written by the insurer’s appointed actuary. A foreign insurer that is required to file a statement under (a) of this section shall, on written request of the director, file an actuarial opinion summary with the director. The actuarial opinion summary must follow, for a given year, the reporting format and requirements specified in the annual financial statement instructions most recently approved by the National Association of Insurance Commissioners and must be supplemented with additional information as required by the director.

An insurer that is required to file a statement under (a) of this section shall prepare an actuarial report and work papers to support each statement of actuarial opinion as required by the annual financial statement instructions most recently approved by the National Association of Insurance Commissioners. If an insurer fails to provide a supporting actuarial report or work papers at the request of the director, or the director determines that the supporting actuarial report or work papers provided by the insurer are incomplete or otherwise unacceptable to the director, the director may engage a qualified actuary at the expense of the insurer to review the statement of actuarial opinion and the basis for the statement and to prepare the supporting actuarial report or work papers.

An actuarial report, actuarial opinion summary, or work paper provided in support of a statement of actuarial opinion and any other information provided by an insurer to the director in connection with the statement of actuarial opinion, the actuarial opinion summary, or the actuarial report issued under this section is confidential; however, nothing in this section limits the director’s authority to release the documents to a national professional organization that disciplines actuaries that is recognized by the director, as long as the material is required for the purpose of professional disciplinary proceedings and the national professional organization establishes procedures satisfactory to the director for preserving the confidentiality of the documents.

In this section,

“appointed actuary” means a qualified actuary who is appointed or retained by a company to provide a statement of actuarial opinion and the related actuarial opinion summary, actuarial report, and work papers;

“qualified actuary” means a member in good standing of the

Casualty Actuarial Society; or

American Academy of Actuaries who has been approved as qualified for signing casualty loss reserve opinions by the Casualty Practice Council of the American Academy of Actuaries.

History.

(§ 25 ch 80 SLA 2006)

Sec. 21.09.210.
Tax on insurers.

Each authorized insurer, and each formerly authorized insurer with respect to premiums written while an authorized insurer in this state, shall file with the director, on or before March 1 in each year, a report of all insurance business written or contracted in the state, with proper proportionate allocation of premium for the property, subjects, or risks in the state insured under policies or contracts covering property, subjects, or risks located or resident in more than one state, during the preceding year ending December 31. The report must show

the amounts paid policyholders on losses;

the total direct premium income including policy membership and other fees, premiums paid by application of dividends, refunds, savings coupon, and similar returns or credits to payment of premiums for new or additional or extended or renewed insurance, charges for payment of premium in installments, and all other consideration for insurance from all kinds and classes of insurance whether designated a premium or otherwise;

the amounts paid policyholders as returned premiums;

the amounts paid policyholders as dividends.

Each insurer, and each formerly authorized insurer with respect to premiums written while an authorized insurer in this state, shall pay a tax on the total direct premium written during the year ending on the preceding December 31 and paid for the insurance of property or risks resident or located in the state, other than wet marine and transportation insurance, after deducting from the total direct premium income the applicable cancellations, returned premiums, the unabsorbed portion of any deposit premium, all policy dividends, unabsorbed premiums refunded to policyholders, refunds, savings, savings coupons, and other similar returns paid or credited to policyholders with respect to their policies. Deductions may not be made of cash surrender value of policies. Considerations received on annuity contracts are not included in the direct premium income and are not subject to tax. The tax shall be paid to the director at least annually but not more often than once each quarter on the dates specified by the director. The method of payment must be by the electronic or other payment method specified by the director. Except as provided under (m) of this section, the tax is computed at the rate of

for domestic and foreign insurers, except hospital and medical service corporations, 2.7 percent;

for hospital and medical service corporations, six percent of their gross premiums less claims paid.

[Repealed, § 48 ch 29 SLA 1987.]

An authorized insurer shall, with respect to all wet marine and transportation contracts written in this state during the preceding calendar year, pay to the director a tax of three-quarters of one percent on its gross underwriting profit. The director shall specify the dates that payment is due and the electronic or other method by which payment is to be made. The gross underwriting profit is computed by deducting, from the net premiums on wet marine and transportation insurance contracts, the net losses paid during the calendar year under the contracts. In the case of an insurer issuing participating contracts, the gross underwriting profit may not include, for computation of the tax prescribed by this section, the amounts refunded or paid as participation dividends by the insurers to the holders of the contracts. In this subsection,

“net losses” means gross losses less salvage and recoveries on reinsurance ceded;

“net premiums” means gross premiums less all return premiums and premiums for reinsurance.

Payment to the director by an insurer of the tax upon its premiums required by this section shall be in lieu of all other taxes imposed by the state upon premiums, franchise, privilege, or other taxes measured by income of the insurer.

The state hereby pre-empts the field of imposing excise, privilege, franchise, income, license, permit, registration, and similar taxes, licenses, and fees upon insurers and their general agents, agents, and representatives as such; and on the intangible property of insurers or agents; and all political subdivisions of agencies in the state, including home rule boroughs or cities, are prohibited from imposing or levying upon insurers, or upon their general agents, agents, and representatives as such, any tax, license, or fee. However, this subsection shall not be construed as prohibiting the imposition by political subdivisions of taxes upon real and tangible personal property of insurers and their general agents, agents, and representatives.

An insurer shall pay to the division a late payment fee of $50 a month plus five percent of the tax due each calendar month or part of a month during which the insurer fails to pay the full amount of the tax, or a portion of the tax, and interest at the rate of one percent of the tax due each calendar month or part of a month for the period the insurer fails to pay the premium tax in this section or in AS

21.09.270

. The late payment fee, not including interest, may not exceed $250 plus 25 percent of the tax due. The tax payment shall be made in the form required by the director, or a penalty shall be added to the tax of 25 percent of the tax due, not to exceed $2,000, with a minimum penalty of $100. In addition to any other penalty provided by law, a civil penalty may be assessed of not more than $10,000 if an insurer wilfully violates this section. The director may suspend or revoke the certificate of authority of an insurer that fails to pay taxes, a penalty, or a late payment fee as required under this section.

The provisions of this section do not apply to title insurance companies. A premium tax on title insurance companies shall be levied in accordance with the provisions of AS

21.66.110

.

Premiums paid by the state for insurance policies and contracts purchased under the provisions of AS 39.30 are exempt from taxation under this section. An insurer may not include the tax imposed under this section in a premium charged on an insurance policy or contract purchased by the state under the provisions of AS 39.30. An insurer may claim the exemption on forms provided by the division of insurance.

The provisions of AS

21.96.070

apply to a taxpayer who is required to pay a tax due under this section.

If, within three years after the date the tax under this section was due, an insurer discovers a mistake or misinterpretation that resulted in an overpayment of the tax in an amount exceeding $250 in any one calendar year, the insurer may make a written request to the director for a refund. If the director determines a valid mistake or misinterpretation has occurred, the director shall refund to the insurer the amount of the excess tax by granting, at the director’s discretion, a monetary refund or premium tax credit. A premium tax credit shall be used in the next calendar year to the extent possible and any unused credit shall be paid as a monetary refund. A premium tax credit may not reduce the payable tax, calculated without use of the credit, to less than zero.

A premium tax credit granted under (k) of this section may not carry over as an attribute in a transaction under AS

21.69.610

,

21.69.620

, AS 21.78, or a similar transaction entered into by a foreign insurer.

The tax imposed under this section for an individual life insurance policy shall be computed at the rate of

2.7 percent of policy year premium up to $100,000; and

0.08 percent of policy year premium exceeding $100,000.

Premiums on which taxes are paid under (m)(2) of this section are not subject to AS

21.09.270

.

A qualified insurer is entitled to a premium tax credit under AS

21.55.220

.

In this section, “premium tax credit” means an amount that an insurer may use as an offset against a premium tax payment.

History.

(§ 1 ch 120 SLA 1966; am § 29 ch 137 SLA 1982; am § 1 ch 118 SLA 1986; am § 41 ch 14 SLA 1987; am §§ 1, 48 ch 29 SLA 1987; am § 1 ch 23 SLA 1989; am §§ 16 — 18 ch 67 SLA 1992; am § 1 ch 21 SLA 1994; am § 14 ch 62 SLA 1995; am §§ 6, 7 ch 81 SLA 1997; am §§ 1, 2 ch 131 SLA 1998; am §§ 13 — 15 ch 38 SLA 2002; am §§ 7 — 11 ch 96 SLA 2004; am § 1 ch 108 SLA 2006; am § 15 ch 8 SLA 2011; am § 1 ch 13 SLA 2015; am § 1 ch 62 SLA 2018)

Delayed repeal of subsection (j) in 2025. —

Under secs. 2 and 37, ch. 61, SLA 2014, as amended by sec. 40, ch. 101, SLA 2018, subsection (j) of this section is repealed January 1, 2025.

Revisor's notes. —

Subsection (m) was enacted as (n). Relettered in 1998, at which time former subsection (m) was relettered as (n) [now (p)] and an internal reference in subsection (b) was conformed. Subsection (n) was enacted as (o) and relettered in 2004, at which time former (n) was relettered as (o). Subsection (o) was enacted as (p) and relettered in 2006, at which time former (o) was relettered as (p). In 2010, in subsection (j), “AS

21.96.070

and

21.96.075

” was substituted for “AS 21.89.070 and

21.89.075

” to reflect the 2010 renumbering of AS 21.89.070 and

21.89.075

.

Under sec. 1, ch. 62, SLA 2018, subsection (j) was repealed.
Under sec. 40, ch. 101,
SLA 2018, the delayed repeal of subsection (j) by sec. 37, ch. 61, SLA 2014, was extended to 2025.
To reconcile these provisions, the repeal by ch. 62 was treated as an amendment of subsection (j) that deleted the reference to AS

21.96.075

, which was also repealed by sec. 1, ch. 62, SLA 2018.
This treatment is in accord with the revisor's instruction provided in sec. 38(a), ch. 101, SLA 2018.

In 2025, under secs. 2 and 37, ch. 61, SLA 2014, as amended by sec. 40, ch. 101, SLA 2018, the amendment to subsection (j) by those sections to remove a reference to AS

21.96.070

will be treated as a repeal of subsection (j) due to the 2018 repeal of AS

21.96.075

and its removal from subsection (j) (see the earlier 2018 revisor's note).
This treatment is in accord with the revisor's instruction provided in sec. 38(b), ch. 101, SLA 2018,
which provides that “the revisor of statutes shall treat the removal of the cross references to AS

21.96.070

in AS

21.09.210(j)

…as a repeal of...AS

21.09.210(j)

”.

Cross references. —

For premium tax on nonadmitted insurers and independently procured insurance, see AS

21.33.055

and

21.33.061

.

Administrative Code. —

For frequency and method of premium tax payments, see 3 AAC 21, art. 5.

For surplus lines — unauthorized insurers, see 3 AAC 25.

Effect of amendments. —

The 2015 amendment, effective August 9, 2015, substituted “0.08” for “one-tenth of one” in subsection (m)(2).

The 2018 amendment, effective January 1, 2019, in (j), following “AS

21.96.070

” deleted “and

21.96.075

”.

Editor's notes. —

Under sec. 2, ch. 13, SLA 2015, the 2015 amendment to paragraph (m)(2) applies to “policy year premiums for a calendar year that begins after December 31, 2015.”

Secs. 21.09.220 — 21.09.240.
Resident agent’s counter signature; exception; affidavit requirement. [Repealed, § 2 ch 41 SLA 1984.]

Sec. 21.09.242.
Cooperation with the Department of Health and Social Services.

An insurer, including a pharmacy benefits manager, with respect to medical assistance programs under AS 47.07, shall cooperate with the Department of Health and Social Services to

provide, with respect to an individual who is eligible for or is provided medical assistance under AS 47.07, on the request of the department, information to determine during what period the individual or the individual’s spouse or dependents may be or may have been covered by the insurer and the nature of the coverage that is or was provided by the insurer, including the name and address of the insurer and the identifying number of the health care insurance plan;

accept the department’s right of recovery and the assignment to the department of any right of an individual or other entity to payment from the party for an item or service for which payment has been made under AS 47.07;

respond to any inquiry by the department regarding a claim for payment for any health care item or service that is submitted not later than three years after the date of the provision of the health care item or service; and

agree not to deny a claim submitted by the department solely on the basis of the date of submission of the claim, the type or format of the claim form, or a failure to present proper documentation at the point-of-sale that is the basis of the claim if

the claim is submitted by the department within the three-year period beginning on the date on which the item or service was furnished; and

any action by the department to enforce its rights with respect to the claim is commenced within six years after the department’s submission of the claim.

An assessable entity, as defined in AS

18.09.990

, shall provide information and assessments to the Department of Health and Social Services and the State Vaccine Assessment Council established under AS

18.09.210

as necessary for the statewide immunization program established under AS

18.09.200

.

History.

(§ 1 ch 96 SLA 2006; am § 3 ch 30 SLA 2014)

Revisor’s notes. —

Enacted as AS 21.09.240 and renumbered in 2006.

Effect of amendments. —

The 2014 amendment, effective January 1, 2015, added (b).

Sec. 21.09.245.
Required notice.

If an insurer intends to change the insurer’s name, domicile, or other information provided on the certificate of authority, the insurer shall file a notice of the change with the director within 30 days before or after the intended change takes effect.

If an insurer changes the insurer’s articles of incorporation, bylaws, business address, phone number, electronic mailing address, or other information maintained by the director, the insurer shall file a notice of the change with the director not later than 90 days after the effective date of the change.

Failure by an insurer to provide notification required by this section may result in a civil penalty of up to $1,000 and, additionally, a civil penalty of up to $50 for each day that the information is withheld from the director.

History.

(§ 8 ch 81 SLA 1997; am § 24 ch 23 SLA 2011)

Sec. 21.09.247.
Biographical affidavits.

A domestic insurer shall file with the director a complete affidavit of biographical information not later than 30 days after the appointment of an officer or director of the insurer. If requested by the director, a foreign insurer shall file with the director an affidavit of biographical information for the appointment of an officer or director of the insurer. A filing under this section must be on a form approved by the director. A filing is not required if a biographical affidavit of the officer or director has been submitted to the director within one year before the date of appointment. A biographical affidavit filed under this section is confidential and not subject to public inspection.

History.

(§ 25 ch 23 SLA 2011)

Sec. 21.09.250.
Prohibited acts.

An insurer doing business in this state may not make, write, place, or cause to be made, written, or placed in this state a policy, duplicate policy, or contract of insurance of any kind or character, or general or floating policy upon persons or property resident, situated, or located in this state, from or through a person required to be licensed who has not secured a license in this state. An insurer may not pay a commission or any form of remuneration to a person, firm, or organization for the writing or placing of insurance coverage in this state unless that person, firm, or organization holds a license issued by the director.

History.

(§ 1 ch 120 SLA 1966; am § 2 ch 29 SLA 1987; am § 15 ch 62 SLA 1995)

Sec. 21.09.260.
Penalties.

An insurer that the director determines, following an appropriate hearing as provided in AS

21.06.170

—

21.06.230

, has violated the provisions of AS

21.09.250

is subject to a civil penalty of not more than $2,500 for each violation. The director may suspend or revoke the license of the insurer for a violation of AS

21.09.250

, but violation does not invalidate the insurance contract.

History.

(§ 1 ch 120 SLA 1966; am § 1 ch 41 SLA 1984; am § 2 ch 149 SLA 1984)

Sec. 21.09.270.
Retaliation.

If, under the laws of another state or foreign country, taxes, licenses, and other fees, in the aggregate, and fines, penalties, deposit requirements, or other material obligations, prohibitions, or restrictions are or would be imposed upon Alaska insurers, or upon their agents or representatives, that are in excess of the taxes, licenses, and other fees, in the aggregate, or that are in excess of the fines, penalties, deposit requirements, or other obligations, prohibitions, or restrictions directly imposed upon similar insurers, or upon their agents or representatives, of another state or country under the statutes of this state, as long as the laws of the other state or country continue in force or are applied, the same taxes, licenses, and other fees, in the aggregate, or fines, penalties, or deposit requirements or other material obligations, prohibitions, or restrictions of whatever kinds shall be imposed by the director upon the insurers, or upon their agents or representatives, of the other state or country doing business or seeking to do business in this state. A tax, license or other fee or other obligation imposed by a city, county, or other political subdivision or agency of another state or country on Alaska insurers or their agents or representatives shall be considered to be imposed by the state or country within the meaning of this section.

This section does not apply to personal income taxes, to ad valorem taxes on real or personal property, or to special purpose obligations or assessments imposed by another state in connection with particular kinds of insurance other than property insurance; except that deductions from premium taxes or other taxes otherwise payable allowed on accounts of real estate or personal property taxes paid shall be taken into consideration by the director in determining the propriety and extent of retaliatory action under this section.

For the purposes of this section the domicile of an alien insurer, other than insurers formed under the laws of Canada or a province of Canada, shall be that state designated by the insurer in writing filed with the director at the time of admission to this state or within six months after July 1, 1966, whichever date is the later, and may be any one of the following states:

that in which the insurer was first authorized to transact insurance;

that in which is located the insurer’s principal place of business in the United States;

that in which is held the larger deposit of trusteed assets of the insurer for the protection of its policyholders and creditors in the United States.

If the insurer makes no designation, its domicile shall be considered to be that state in which its principal place of business in the United States is located.

If an insurer is formed under the laws of Canada or a province of Canada, its domicile is the province in which its head office is located.

For purposes of the application of (a) of this section, a health care insurer, as defined in AS

21.54.500

, may not include taxes, assessments, or other similar obligations on health care insurance premiums received from the state, a municipality, a city or borough school district, a regional educational attendance area, the University of Alaska, or a community college operated by the University of Alaska.

History.

(§ 1 ch 120 SLA 1966; am § 3 ch 131 SLA 1998; am §§ 16, 17 ch 38 SLA 2002; am § 2 ch 38 SLA 2007)

Sec. 21.09.280.
General agents. [Repealed, § 47 ch 51 SLA 1990.]

Sec. 21.09.290.
Risk retention groups.

A risk retention group formed in this state shall

comply with 15 U.S.C. 3901 — 3906 (Liability Risk Retention Act); and

qualify for and hold in good standing a certificate of authority under AS

21.09.010

—

21.09.320

, limited to liability insurance only.

A risk retention group shall submit with its application for a certificate of authority

the identity of

the initial members of the risk retention group;

all persons who organized the risk retention group;

all persons who will provide administrative services to the risk retention group;

all persons who will influence or control the activities of the risk retention group;

the amount and nature of initial capitalization;

a plan of operation or a feasibility study that includes the coverage, deductible, coverage limit, rate, and rating classification system for the type or class of liability insurance the group intends to offer; and

the states in which the risk retention group intends to operate.

At least 30 days before a domestic risk retention group implements a material change or revision to an approved plan of operation or feasibility study, the material change or revision shall be filed with the director. A material change or revision may not be implemented unless the domestic risk retention group receives the director’s written approval. In this subsection, “material change or revision” includes an offering of an additional type or class of liability insurance.

In this section,

“liability” means legal liability for damages, including costs of defense, legal costs and fees, and other claims expenses, because of injury to another person, damage to property, or other damage or loss to a person resulting from or arising out of a business, whether profit or nonprofit, trade, product, service, including a professional service, or an activity of a state or local government, or an agency or political subdivision of a state or local government; “liability” does not include personal risk liability or employer’s liability with respect to its employees other than legal liability under 45 U.S.C. 51 (Federal Employers’ Liability Act);

“personal risk liability” means liability for damages because of injury to a person, damage to property, or other loss or damage resulting from a personal, familial, or household responsibility or activity and that is not a responsibility or activity described under (1) of this subsection.

History.

(§ 16 ch 62 SLA 1995)

Sec. 21.09.300.
Disclosure of material transactions.

A domestic insurer shall file a report with the director disclosing a material acquisition and disposition of assets or a material nonrenewal, cancellation, or revision of ceded reinsurance agreements unless the acquisition and disposition of assets or material nonrenewal, cancellation, or revision of ceded reinsurance agreements have been submitted to the director for review, approval, or information purposes as required by this title.

The report required under (a) of this section is due 15 days after the end of the calendar month in which a reportable transaction occurs.

Except as provided in this section, a report obtained by or disclosed to the director under this section is confidential, is not subject to subpoena, and may not be made public by the director, or another person, without the prior written consent of the insurer submitting the report. A report under this section may be disclosed to an insurance regulatory agency of another state or to the National Association of Insurance Commissioners, with notice of the disclosure sent to the insurer. If the director, after giving an insurer notice and an opportunity to be heard, determines that the interest of policyholders, shareholders, or the public will be served by publication of the report, the director may publish all or any part of the report in a manner the director determines appropriate.

A domestic insurer’s report of an acquisition or disposition of an asset

shall be made under (a) of this section if the acquisition or disposition is material; for purposes of this subsection, an acquisition or disposition, or the aggregate of a series of related acquisitions or related dispositions during any 30-day period is material if it is nonrecurring, not in the ordinary course of business, and involves more than five percent of the reporting insurer’s total admitted assets as reported in its most recent financial statement required by law that is filed with the division;

shall be made on asset acquisition, including a purchase, lease, exchange, merger, consolidation, succession, or other acquisition other than the

construction or development of real property by or for the reporting insurer; or

acquisition of material for construction or development of real property;

shall be made on asset disposition including a sale, lease, exchange, merger, consolidation, mortgage, hypothecation, assignment for the benefit of creditors, or abandonment;

must include information on the

date of transaction;

manner of acquisition or disposition;

description of the assets involved;

nature and amount of the consideration given or received;

purpose of, or reason for, the transaction;

manner by which the amount of consideration was determined;

gain or loss recognized or realized as a result of the transaction; and

names of persons from whom the assets were acquired or to whom the assets were disposed.

A domestic insurer’s report of nonrenewal, cancellation, or revision of a ceded reinsurance agreement

shall be made under (a) of this section if the nonrenewal, cancellation, or revision is material; for purposes of this subsection, a material nonrenewal, cancellation, or revision is one that affects (A) for property and casualty business, including accident and health business when written as property and casualty business, more than 50 percent of an insurer’s ceded written premium; or (B) for life, annuity, and accident and health business, more than 50 percent of the total reserve credit taken for business ceded, on an annualized basis as indicated in the insurer’s most recently filed statutory statement; however, a filing is not required if the insurer’s ceded written premium or the total reserve credit taken for business ceded represents, on an annual basis, less than 10 percent of direct written premiums and assumed written premiums or 10 percent of the statutory reserve requirement before a cession;

shall be filed without regard to which party has initiated the nonrenewal, cancellation, or revision of ceded reinsurance whenever any of the following conditions exist:

the entire cession has been cancelled, nonrenewed, or revised and ceded indemnity and loss adjustment expense reserves after a nonrenewal, cancellation, or revision represent less than 50 percent of the comparable reserves that would have been ceded had the nonrenewal, cancellation, or revision not occurred;

an admitted or accredited reinsurer has been replaced on an existing cession by an unauthorized reinsurer; however, a report shall be filed only if the result of the revision affects more than 10 percent of the cession; or

collateral requirements previously established for unauthorized reinsurers have been reduced; however, a report shall be filed only if the result of the revision affects more than 10 percent of the cession; and

must include

the effective date of the nonrenewal, cancellation, or revision;

a description of the transaction with an identification of the initiator of the transaction;

the purpose of, or reason for, the transaction; and

if applicable, the identity of the replacement reinsurers.

An insurer is required to report under (a) of this section on a nonconsolidated basis unless the insurer is part of a consolidated group of insurers that utilizes a pooling arrangement or 100 percent reinsurance agreement that affects the solvency and integrity of the insurer’s reserves and the insurer ceded substantially all of its direct and assumed business to the pool. An insurer is presumed to have ceded substantially all of its direct and assumed business to a pool if the insurer has less than $1,000,000 total direct written premiums and assumed written premiums during a calendar year that is not subject to a pooling arrangement and the net income of the business not subject to the pooling arrangement represents less than five percent of the insurer’s capital and surplus.

History.

(§ 16 ch 62 SLA 1995)

Cross references. —

For effect of subsection (c) on Alaska Rule of Civil Procedure 45, see § 114, ch. 62, SLA 1995 in the Temporary and Special Acts.